Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.740

Photographing and fingerprinting—Transmittal of data.

(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town, and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly operating within this state to furnish within seventy-two hours from the time of arrest to the section the required sets of fingerprints together with other identifying data as may be prescribed by the chief, of any person lawfully arrested, fingerprinted, and photographed pursuant to RCW 43.43.735.

(2) Law enforcement agencies may retain and file copies of the fingerprints, photographs, and other identifying data and information obtained pursuant to RCW 43.43.735. Said records shall remain in the possession of the law enforcement agency as part of the identification record and are not returnable to the subjects thereof.

[ 2006 c 294 s 7; 1989 c 334 s 10. Prior: 1987 c 486 s 13; 1987 c 450 s 3; 1985 c 201 s 14; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 9.]